Utah statutes.
76-10-1908.   Forfeiture -- Grounds -- Procedure -- Disposition of property
seized.
(1) (a)  Any of the following property shall be subject to civil or criminal
forfeiture:
(i)  any conveyance including vehicles, aircraft, watercraft, or other vessel
used in violation of Section 76-10-1904; and
(ii)  any property which is the net proceeds of a violation of Section
76-10-1903, 76-10-1904, or 76-10-1906.
(b)  For purposes of this section, the "net proceeds" of an offense means
property acquired as a result of the violation minus the direct costs of
acquiring the property.
(2)  Property subject to forfeiture under Subsection (1) may be seized by any
peace officer of this state upon process issued by any court having
jurisdiction over the property.  However, seizure without process may be made
when:
(a)  the seizure is incident to an arrest or search under a search warrant, an
inspection under an administrative inspection warrant, under a writ of
attachment, or under a writ of garnishment;
(b)  the property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment
in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding under
this section; or
(c)  the peace officer has probable cause to believe that the property has
been used in violation of Section 76-10-1903, 76-10-1904, or 76-10-1906.
(3)  Forfeiture proceedings under this section shall be commenced in
accordance with the procedures and substantive protections of Title 24,
Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Forfeiture Procedures Act.
(4)  Property taken or detained under this section is not repleviable but is
in custody of the law enforcement agency making the seizure, subject only to
the orders and decrees of the court or the official having jurisdiction.  When
property is seized under this chapter, the appropriate person or agency may:
(a)  place the property under seal;
(b)  remove the property to a place designated by it or the warrant under
which it was seized; or
(c)  take custody of the property and remove it to an appropriate location for
disposition in accordance with law.
